Utah statutes.
20A-11-1005.   Fines for failing to file a financial statement.

(1)  The chief election officer shall fine a filing entity $100 for failing to file a financial statement by the filing deadline.

(2)  If a filing entity is unable to pay the fine or files an affidavit of impecuniosity in a manner similar to Subsection 20A-9-201(5)(d), the chief election officer shall impose the fine against the candidate or treasurer, as appropriate.

(3)  The chief election officer shall deposit fines collected under this chapter in the General Fund.



Enacted by Chapter 389, 2010 General Session

